Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-15,188
Act; supplemental to other laws; how construed.

The powers conferred by the Remedial Action Plan Monitoring Act shall be independent of and in addition and supplemental to any other provisions of the laws of the State of Nebraska with reference to the matters covered hereby, and the act shall be considered as a complete and independent act and not as amendatory of or limited by any other provision of the laws of the State of Nebraska.

Laws 1994, LB 1349, § 8.